viceverser/data/fr_ud.aff
FLAG long
SFX v0 écer èce/ écer  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 écher èche/ écher  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 écrer ècre/ écrer  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 éder ède/ éder  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 éger ège/ éger  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 égler ègle/ égler  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 égner ègne/ égner  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 égrer ègre/ égrer  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 éguer ègue/ éguer  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 éler èle/ éler  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 émer ème/ émer  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 éner ène/ éner  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 éper èpe/ éper  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 équer èque/ équer  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 érer ère/ érer  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 éser èse/ éser  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 éter ète/ éter  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 étrer ètre/ étrer  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 évrer èvre/ évrer  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 éyer èye/ éyer  is:impe is:2sg
SFX v0 er ons/ [^cg]er  is:impe is:1pl
SFX v0 écer éçons/ écer  is:impe is:1pl
SFX v0 éger égeons/ éger  is:impe is:1pl
SFX v0 er ez/ er  is:impe is:2pl

SFX d0 Y 144
SFX d0 er er/ er  is:infi
SFX d0 er ant/ er  is:ppre
SFX d0 eter ette/ jeter  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX d0 eter ette/ [^j]eter  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX d0 eter ète/ [^j]eter  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX d0 eler elle/ ppeler  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX d0 eler elle/ [^p].eler  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX d0 eler èle/ [^p].eler  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX d0 eler elle/ épeler  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX d0 eler èle/ épeler  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX d0 er è/ er  is:ipre is:1isg
SFX d0 eter ettes/ jeter  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX d0 eter ettes/ [^j]eter  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX d0 eter ètes/ [^j]eter  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX d0 eler elles/ ppeler  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX d0 eler elles/ [^p].eler  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX d0 eler èles/ [^p].eler  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX d0 eler elles/ épeler  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX d0 eler èles/ épeler  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX d0 er ons/ er  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX d0 er ez/ er  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX d0 eter ettent/ jeter  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX d0 eter ettent/ [^j]eter  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX d0 eter ètent/ [^j]eter  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX d0 eler ellent/ ppeler  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX d0 eler ellent/ [^p].eler  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX d0 eler èlent/ [^p].eler  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX d0 eler ellent/ épeler  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX d0 eler èlent/ épeler  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX d0 er ais/ er  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX d0 er ait/ er  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX d0 er ions/ er  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX d0 er iez/ er  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX d0 er aient/ er  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX d0 er ai/ er  is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX d0 er as/ er  is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX d0 er a/ er  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX d0 er âmes/ er  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX d0 er âtes/ er  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX d0 er èrent/ er  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX d0 eter etterai/ jeter  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX d0 eter etterai/ [^j]eter  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX d0 eter èterai/ [^j]eter  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX d0 eler ellerai/ ppeler  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX d0 eler ellerai/ [^p].eler  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX d0 eler èlerai/ [^p].eler  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX d0 eler ellerai/ épeler  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX d0 eler èlerai/ épeler  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX d0 eter etteras/ jeter  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX d0 eter etteras/ [^j]eter  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX d0 eter èteras/ [^j]eter  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX d0 eler elleras/ ppeler  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX d0 eler elleras/ [^p].eler  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX d0 eler èleras/ [^p].eler  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX d0 eler elleras/ épeler  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX d0 eler èleras/ épeler  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX d0 eter ettera/ jeter  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX d0 eter ettera/ [^j]eter  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX d0 eter ètera/ [^j]eter  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX d0 eler ellera/ ppeler  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX d0 eler ellera/ [^p].eler  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX d0 eler èlera/ [^p].eler  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX d0 eler ellera/ épeler  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX d0 eler èlera/ épeler  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX d0 eter etterons/ jeter  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX d0 eter etterons/ [^j]eter  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX d0 eter èterons/ [^j]eter  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX d0 eler ellerons/ ppeler  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX d0 eler ellerons/ [^p].eler  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX d0 eler èlerons/ [^p].eler  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX d0 eler ellerons/ épeler  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX d0 eler èlerons/ épeler  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX d0 eter etterez/ jeter  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX d0 eter etterez/ [^j]eter  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX d0 eter èterez/ [^j]eter  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX d0 eler ellerez/ ppeler  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX d0 eler ellerez/ [^p].eler  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX d0 eler èlerez/ [^p].eler  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX d0 eler ellerez/ épeler  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX d0 eler èlerez/ épeler  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX d0 eter etteront/ jeter  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX d0 eter etteront/ [^j]eter  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX d0 eter èteront/ [^j]eter  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX d0 eler elleront/ ppeler  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX d0 eler elleront/ [^p].eler  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX d0 eler èleront/ [^p].eler  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX d0 eler elleront/ épeler  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX d0 eler èleront/ épeler  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX d0 eter etterais/ jeter  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX d0 eter etterais/ [^j]eter  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX d0 eter èterais/ [^j]eter  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX d0 eler ellerais/ ppeler  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX d0 eler ellerais/ [^p].eler  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX d0 eler èlerais/ [^p].eler  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX d0 eler ellerais/ épeler  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX d0 eler èlerais/ épeler  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX d0 eter etterait/ jeter  is:cond is:3sg
SFX d0 eter etterait/ [^j]eter  is:cond is:3sg
SFX d0 eter èterait/ [^j]eter  is:cond is:3sg
SFX d0 eler ellerait/ ppeler  is:cond is:3sg
SFX d0 eler ellerait/ [^p].eler  is:cond is:3sg
SFX d0 eler èlerait/ [^p].eler  is:cond is:3sg
SFX d0 eler ellerait/ épeler  is:cond is:3sg
SFX d0 eler èlerait/ épeler  is:cond is:3sg
SFX d0 eter etterions/ jeter  is:cond is:1pl
SFX d0 eter etterions/ [^j]eter  is:cond is:1pl
SFX d0 eter èterions/ [^j]eter  is:cond is:1pl
SFX d0 eler ellerions/ ppeler  is:cond is:1pl
SFX d0 eler ellerions/ [^p].eler  is:cond is:1pl
SFX d0 eler èlerions/ [^p].eler  is:cond is:1pl
SFX d0 eler ellerions/ épeler  is:cond is:1pl
SFX d0 eler èlerions/ épeler  is:cond is:1pl
SFX d0 eter etteriez/ jeter  is:cond is:2pl
SFX d0 eter etteriez/ [^j]eter  is:cond is:2pl
SFX d0 eter èteriez/ [^j]eter  is:cond is:2pl
SFX d0 eler elleriez/ ppeler  is:cond is:2pl
SFX d0 eler elleriez/ [^p].eler  is:cond is:2pl
SFX d0 eler èleriez/ [^p].eler  is:cond is:2pl
SFX d0 eler elleriez/ épeler  is:cond is:2pl
SFX d0 eler èleriez/ épeler  is:cond is:2pl
SFX d0 eter etteraient/ jeter  is:cond is:3pl
SFX d0 eter etteraient/ [^j]eter  is:cond is:3pl
SFX d0 eter èteraient/ [^j]eter  is:cond is:3pl
SFX d0 eler elleraient/ ppeler  is:cond is:3pl
SFX d0 eler elleraient/ [^p].eler  is:cond is:3pl
SFX d0 eler èleraient/ [^p].eler  is:cond is:3pl
SFX d0 eler elleraient/ épeler  is:cond is:3pl
SFX d0 eler èleraient/ épeler  is:cond is:3pl
SFX d0 er asse/ er  is:simp is:1sg
SFX d0 er asses/ er  is:simp is:2sg
SFX d0 er ât/ er  is:simp is:3sg
SFX d0 er assions/ er  is:simp is:1pl
SFX d0 er assiez/ er  is:simp is:2pl
SFX d0 er assent/ er  is:simp is:3pl
SFX d0 eter ette/ jeter  is:impe is:2sg
SFX d0 eter ette/ [^j]eter  is:impe is:2sg
SFX d0 eter ète/ [^j]eter  is:impe is:2sg
SFX d0 eler elle/ ppeler  is:impe is:2sg
SFX d0 eler elle/ [^p].eler  is:impe is:2sg
SFX d0 eler èle/ [^p].eler  is:impe is:2sg
SFX d0 eler elle/ épeler  is:impe is:2sg
SFX d0 eler èle/ épeler  is:impe is:2sg
SFX d0 er ons/ er  is:impe is:1pl
SFX d0 er ez/ er  is:impe is:2pl
