viceverser/data/fr_ud.dic
abéquer/v0p+  po:verb
accéder/v0p.  po:verb
accréter/v0p+  po:verb
aciérer/v0p+  po:verb
adultérer/v0p+  po:verb
afférer/v0p.  po:verb
agglomérer/v0p+  po:verb
aiguilleter/d0p+  po:verb
aléser/v0p+  po:verb
allécher/v0p+  po:verb
alléguer/v0p+  po:verb
amonceler/d0p+  po:verb
anhéler/v0p.  po:verb
anneler/d0p+  po:verb
appeler/d0p+  po:verb
arpéger/v0p+  po:verb
assécher/v0p+  po:verb
assiéger/v0p+  po:verb
atteler/d0p+  po:verb
babeler/d0p.  po:verb
banqueter/d0p.  po:verb
baqueter/d0p+  po:verb
baréter/v0p.  po:verb
bateler/d0p.  po:verb
bêcheveter/d0p+  po:verb
becqueter/d0p+  po:verb
béguer/v0p.  po:verb
béqueter/d0p+  po:verb
blasphémer/v0p+  po:verb
bléser/v0p.  po:verb
bosseler/d0p+  po:verb
botteler/d0p+  po:verb
bourreler/d0p+  po:verb
bretteler/d0p+  po:verb
breveter/d0p+  po:verb
briqueter/d0p+  po:verb
budgéter/v0p+  po:verb
cacheter/d0p+  po:verb
cafeter/d0p+  po:verb
cailleter/d0p.  po:verb
caleter/d0p+  po:verb
canneler/d0p+  po:verb
capeler/d0p+  po:verb
caqueter/d0p.  po:verb
caréner/v0p+  po:verb
carreler/d0p+  po:verb
célébrer/v0p+  po:verb
chanceler/d0p.  po:verb
chapeler/d0p+  po:verb
chevreter/d0p.  po:verb
chiqueter/d0p+  po:verb
claqueter/d0p.  po:verb
claveter/d0p+  po:verb
cliqueter/d0p.  po:verb
cogérer/v0p+  po:verb
colleter/d0p+  po:verb
compéter/v0p.  po:verb
concaténer/v0p+  po:verb
concélébrer/v0p+  po:verb
confédérer/v0p+  po:verb
conglomérer/v0p+  po:verb
coopérer/v0p.  po:verb
coqueter/d0p+  po:verb
cordeler/d0p+  po:verb
corréler/v0p+  po:verb
craqueler/d0p+  po:verb
craqueter/d0p.  po:verb
crémer/v0p.  po:verb
cuveler/d0p+  po:verb
déblatérer/v0p.  po:verb
débosseler/d0p+  po:verb
décapeler/d0p+  po:verb
décélérer/v0p.  po:verb
décerveler/d0p+  po:verb
décher/v0p+  po:verb
déchiqueter/d0p+  po:verb
décliqueter/d0p+  po:verb
décompléter/v0p+  po:verb
décorréler/v0p+  po:verb
déféquer/v0p+  po:verb
déficeler/d0p+  po:verb
dégénérer/v0p+  po:verb
déléguer/v0p+  po:verb
démoucheter/d0p+  po:verb
dénickeler/d0p+  po:verb
denteler/d0p+  po:verb
dépaqueter/d0p+  po:verb
déposséder/v0p+  po:verb
déprotéger/v0p+  po:verb
désaciérer/v0p+  po:verb
désagglomérer/v0p+  po:verb
désaliéner/v0p+  po:verb
désensorceler/d0p+  po:verb
désespérer/v0p+  po:verb
déshypothéquer/v0p+  po:verb
désinsérer/v0p+  po:verb
désoxygéner/v0p+  po:verb
détonneler/d0p+  po:verb
diéser/v0p+  po:verb
digérer/v0p+  po:verb
disséquer/v0p+  po:verb
duveter/d0p+  po:verb
écheler/d0p+  po:verb
écher/v0p+  po:verb
écolleter/d0p+  po:verb
embratteler/d0p+  po:verb
émécher/v0p+  po:verb
emmanteler/d0p+  po:verb
émoucheter/d0p+  po:verb
empéguer/v0p+  po:verb
empenneler/d0p+  po:verb
empiéter/v0p.  po:verb
enfiévrer/v0p+  po:verb
engrumeler/d0p+  po:verb
ensorceler/d0p+  po:verb
enstérer/v0p+  po:verb
énumérer/v0p+  po:verb
épeler/d0p+  po:verb
épinceter/d0p+  po:verb
étinceler/d0p.  po:verb
éviscérer/v0p+  po:verb
exaspérer/v0p+  po:verb
excréter/v0p+  po:verb
exulcérer/v0p+  po:verb
fardeler/d0p+  po:verb
ficeler/d0p+  po:verb
flécher/v0p+  po:verb
fuseler/d0p+  po:verb
gangréner/v0p+  po:verb
gobeter/d0p+  po:verb
greneler/d0p+  po:verb
gréser/v0p+  po:verb
grommeler/d0p+  po:verb
guillemeter/d0p+  po:verb
hoqueter/d0p.  po:verb
hydrogéner/v0p+  po:verb
incarcérer/v0p+  po:verb
infogérer/v0p+  po:verb
intégrer/v0p+  po:verb
interpréter/v0p+  po:verb
jarreter/d0p+  po:verb
jeter/d0p+  po:verb
lacérer/v0p+  po:verb
léser/v0p+  po:verb
louveter/d0p.  po:verb
macérer/v0p+  po:verb
métrer/v0p+  po:verb
moleter/d0p+  po:verb
moucheter/d0p+  po:verb
museler/d0p+  po:verb
niveler/d0p+  po:verb
obérer/v0p+  po:verb
opérer/v0p+  po:verb
pailleter/d0p+  po:verb
panteler/d0p.  po:verb
pelleter/d0p+  po:verb
pénétrer/v0p+  po:verb
péter/v0p+  po:verb
piqueter/d0p+  po:verb
posséder/v0p+  po:verb
préférer/v0p+  po:verb
projeter/d0p+  po:verb
proliférer/v0p.  po:verb
rameter/d0p.  po:verb
rapiécer/v0p+  po:verb
rappeler/d0p+  po:verb
recacheter/d0p+  po:verb
recéler/v0p+  po:verb
récupérer/v0p+  po:verb
reficeler/d0p+  po:verb
réfréner/v0p+  po:verb
régner/v0p.  po:verb
réinterpréter/v0p+  po:verb
rempaqueter/d0p+  po:verb
rempiéter/v0p+  po:verb
réoxygéner/v0p+  po:verb
réséquer/v0p+  po:verb
ressemeler/d0p+  po:verb
réverbérer/v0p+  po:verb
ruisseler/d0p.  po:verb
secréter/v0p+  po:verb
sidérer/v0p+  po:verb
soucheter/d0p+  po:verb
subdéléguer/v0p+  po:verb
sukkeler/d0p.  po:verb
surprotéger/v0p+  po:verb
tacheter/d0p+  po:verb
teseter/d0p+  po:verb
tolérer/v0p+  po:verb
triséquer/v0p+  po:verb
tûteler/d0p+  po:verb
vénérer/v0p+  po:verb
voleter/d0p.  po:verb
